Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Dissolution.

Sec. 10.25.310.
Dissolution of cooperative that has not commenced business.

A cooperative that has not commenced business may be dissolved by delivering articles of dissolution to the commissioner.
A majority of the incorporators shall execute and acknowledge articles of dissolution on behalf of the cooperative.
The articles must state

the name of the cooperative;

the address of its principal office;

that the cooperative has not commenced business;

that sums received by the cooperative, less that part disbursed for expenses of the cooperative, have been returned or paid to those entitled to them;

that no debt of the cooperative is unpaid;

that a majority of the incorporators elect to dissolve the cooperative.

History.

(§ 21(1) ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.320.
Dissolution of cooperative that has commenced business.

A cooperative that has commenced business may be dissolved in the manner set out in this section.

The proposition to dissolve shall be submitted to the members of the cooperative. The notice must state the proposition.

The proposition is approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members voting on the proposition if the number of members voting to approve it constitutes a majority of all members of the cooperative.

Upon approval, a certificate of election to dissolve, hereafter designated the “certificate,” executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its presiding officer under its seal, attested by the officer designated by the board, shall be submitted to the commissioner for filing together with an affidavit by the officer executing the certificate stating that the statements in the certificate are true. The certificate must state the name of the cooperative, the address of its principal office, and that the members of the cooperative have voted to dissolve the cooperative.

History.

(§ 21(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Sec. 10.25.330.
Effect of filing certificate of dissolution and affidavit; corporate existence; involuntary dissolution.

Upon the filing of the certificate and affidavit by the commissioner, the cooperative shall cease to carry on its business except to the extent necessary for the winding up of business. However, its corporate existence continues until articles of dissolution have been filed by the commissioner.

A cooperative that does not file its articles of dissolution within two years after the date of filing the certificate mentioned in (a) of this section shall be involuntarily dissolved by the commissioner. Before dissolving the cooperative under this subsection, the commissioner shall give the cooperative written notice of the pending dissolution by mailing the notice to the cooperative. The commissioner shall mail the notice and any subsequent certificate of dissolution to the cooperative in the same manner as required for notices and certificates of involuntary dissolution under AS

10.06.633(i)

.

History.

(§ 21(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 51 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 1999)

Sec. 10.25.340.
Notice to creditors and claimants.

The board of directors shall immediately have a notice of the dissolution proceedings mailed to each known creditor of and claimant against the cooperative and publish it once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or borough in which the principal office of the cooperative is located.

History.

(§ 21(2) ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.350.
Termination of cooperative affairs.

The board of directors shall wind up and settle the affairs of the cooperative, collect sums owing to it, liquidate its property and assets, pay and discharge its debts, obligations, and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage, and do all other things required to wind up its business. After paying or discharging or adequately providing for the payment or discharge of all its debts, obligations, and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage, the directors shall distribute remaining sums, first, to patrons for the pro rata return of all amounts standing to their credit by reason of their patronage and, second, to members for the pro rata repayment of membership fees. Sums then remaining shall be distributed among its members and former members in proportion to their patronage, except to the extent participation in the distribution has been legally waived. The board of directors shall thereupon authorize the execution of articles of dissolution. The presiding officer shall execute and acknowledge articles of dissolution on behalf of the cooperative and the officer designated by the board shall affix and attest to the seal.

History.

(§ 21(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 14 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.360.
Contents of articles of dissolution.

The articles of dissolution must recite that they are executed under this chapter and must state

the name of the cooperative;

the address of its principal office;

the date on which the certificate of election to dissolve was filed by the commissioner;

that there are no actions or suits against the cooperative;

that all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for them;

that the provisions of AS

10.25.320

—

10.25.360

have been complied with.

The presiding officer executing the articles of dissolution shall make and annex to the articles an affidavit stating that the statements contained in the articles are true.

History.

(§ 21(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 99 SLA 1995)